North Carolina, session 2025, HB559.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. FEE MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 95-107 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-107. Assessment and collection of fees; certificates of safe operation.
The assessment of the fees adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 95-69.11,
95-110.5, 95-111.4 95-110.5A, 95-111.4A, and 95-120 95-120A shall be made against the owner
or operator of the equipment and may be collected at the time of inspection. If the fees are not
collected at the time of inspection, the Department must bill the owner or operator of the
equipment for the amount of the fee assessed for the inspection of the equipment and the amount
assessed is payable by the owner or operator of the equipment upon receipt of the bill. Certificates
of safe operation may be withheld by the Department of Labor until such time as the assessed
fees are collected."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 95-108 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-108. Disposition of fees.
All fees collected by the Department of Labor pursuant to G.S. 95-69.11, 95-110.5, 95-111.4
95-110.5A, 95-111.4A, and 95-120 95-120A shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and shall
be used exclusively for inspection inspection, permitting, and certification purposes. Fees
deposited pursuant to this section that have not been expended or encumbered at the end of the
fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for uses consistent with this section."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 95-110.5(20) is repealed.
*H559-v-5*

SECTION 1.(d) Article 14A of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 95-110.5A. Fees.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Department shall charge fees not to exceed the following:
Special Inspection Fee – Expedited $1,000
Temporary Limited Certificate for Construction Use Only; Less than 10 Floors $200.00
Temporary Limited Certificate for Construction Use Only; 10 or More Floors $300.00
Reinspection Fee of Failed New and Repair/Alteration Inspections $1,000
Routine/Annual Elevator Inspections; Less than 10 Floors $200.00
Routine/Annual Elevator Inspections; 10 or More Floors $300.00
Routine/Annual Wheelchair Lift and Dumbwaiter Inspections $100.00
Routine/Annual Escalator and Moving Walk Inspections $500.00
(b) Upon application to the Department for a new or alteration construction permit for a
device subject to this section, an applicant shall submit a permit application fee. The amount of
the permit application fee shall be the greater of (i) two hundred dollars ($200.00) or (ii) one
percent (1%) of the contract price for the alteration or installation of the device being permitted.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years beginning on or
after July 1, 2026, the Department shall adjust the fee amounts listed in subsection (a) of this
section in accordance with the percent change in the annual Consumer Price Index computed by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics using the most recent 12-month period for which data is available.
The adjustment for fees under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00), and
the Commissioner shall publish any increase in fees under this subsection in the North Carolina
Register and on the Department's website at least 60 days prior to any increase."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 95-111.4(19) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(f) Article 14B of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 95-111.4A. Fees.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Department shall charge fees not to exceed the following:
Advance Location Notice (ALN) Application Fee $25.00
Special Inspection Fee – Expedited $1,000
Amusement Major Ride Inspections $250.00
Amusement Return Trip Inspections $500.00
Holiday/Weekend Inspections $500.00
Kiddie Ride Inspections $100.00
Go Kart Inspections (per cart) $50.00
Go Kart Track Inspections $200.00
Amusement Rock Wall Inspections $100.00
Roller Coaster (permanent and portable) Inspections $500.00
Simulators $100.00
Bungee Trampoline Inspections $100.00
Water Slide Inspections $300.00
Train Inspections $250.00
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years beginning on or
after July 1, 2026, the Department shall adjust the fee amounts listed in subsection (a) of this
section in accordance with the percent change in the annual Consumer Price Index computed by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics using the most recent 12-month period for which data is available.
The adjustment for fees under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00), and
the Commissioner shall publish any increase in fees under this subsection in the North Carolina
Register and on the Department's website at least 60 days prior to any increase."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 95-120(9) is repealed.
Page 2 House Bill 559-Ratified

SECTION 1.(h) Article 15 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 95-120A. Fees.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Department shall charge fees not to exceed the following:
Gondolas, Chairlifts, Inclined Railroad Inspections $500.00
J or T Bars and Conveyors Inspections $300.00
Rope Tow Inspections $200.00
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years beginning on or
after July 1, 2026, the Department shall adjust the fee amounts listed in subsection (a) of this
section in accordance with the percent change in the annual Consumer Price Index computed by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics using the most recent 12-month period for which data is available.
The adjustment for fees under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00), and
the Commissioner shall publish any increase in fees under this subsection in the North Carolina
Register and on the Department's website at least 60 days prior to any increase."
SECTION 1.(i) The Commissioner shall publish notice of the changes in fees created
by this section in the North Carolina Register and on the Department's website no later than 30
days after the effective date of this act.
PART II. DEVELOP TRAINING AND APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 2. The Department of Labor (Department) shall consult with the North
Carolina Community College System to develop an in-house training and apprenticeship
program (Program) for elevator inspectors. The Department shall utilize the Program to fill
vacancies in receipt-supported inspector positions within the Elevator and Amusement Device
Division of the Department.
PART III. AMEND INTERIM APPOINTMENT CRITERIA FOR THE BUILDING
CODE COUNCIL AND RESIDENTIAL CODE COUNCIL
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 143-136(a2) reads as rewritten:
"(a2) Process for Appointments by the Governor. – The Governor shall transmit to the
presiding officers of the Senate and the House of Representatives, within four weeks of the
convening of the session of the General Assembly in the year for which the terms in question are
initially appointed or are to expire, the names of the persons to be appointed by the Governor and
submitted to the General Assembly for confirmation by joint resolution. If an appointment is
required pursuant to this subsection when the General Assembly is not in session, the member
may be appointed and serve on an interim basis pending confirmation by the General Assembly.
For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly is not in session only (i) prior to
convening of the regular session, (ii) during any adjournment of the regular session for more than
10 90 days, or (iii) after sine die adjournment of the regular session."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 143-136.1(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) Process for Appointments by the Governor. – The Governor shall transmit to the
presiding officers of the Senate and the House of Representatives, within four weeks of the
convening of the session of the General Assembly in the year for which the terms in question are
initially appointed or are to expire, the names of the persons to be appointed by the Governor and
submitted to the General Assembly for confirmation by joint resolution. If an appointment is
required pursuant to this subsection when the General Assembly is not in session, the member
may be appointed and serve on an interim basis pending confirmation by the General Assembly.
For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly is not in session only (i) prior to
convening of the regular session, (ii) during any adjournment of the regular session for more than
10 90 days, or (iii) after sine die adjournment of the regular session."
House Bill 559-Ratified Page 3

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 4 House Bill 559-Ratified